Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-2201
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 66-2201 to 66-2207:

(1) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment;

(2) E-15 means a blend of ethanol and gasoline in which ethanol comprises fifteen percent of the blend by volume;

(3) E-85 means a blend of ethanol and gasoline in which ethanol comprises seventy percent or more of the blend by volume;

(4) Motor fuel pump means a meter or similar commercial weighing and measuring device used to measure and dispense motor fuel originating from a motor fuel storage tank;

(5) Program means the Renewable Fuel Infrastructure Program created in section 66-2202;

(6) Retail dealer means a person engaged in the business of storing and dispensing motor fuel from a motor fuel pump for sale on a retail basis; and

(7) Retail motor fuel site means a geographic location in this state where a retail dealer sells and dispenses motor fuel from a motor fuel pump on a retail basis.

Laws 2019, LB585, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 369.